Texas, session 891, HB303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  The heading to Section 1.006, Election Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 1.006.  EFFECT OF WEEKEND, [OR] HOLIDAY, OR FORCE MAJEURE. SECTION 2.  Section 1.006, Election Code, is amended by amending Subsection (a) and adding Subsection (g) to read as follows: (a)  If the last day for performance of an act is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal state or national holiday, or the performance of the act is not possible because of an act of God, force majeure, or similar cause beyond the control of the person performing the act, the act is timely if performed on the next regular business day, except as otherwise provided by this code. (g)  For a statewide election or an election with territory located in more than one county, the secretary of state shall make the determination whether an event qualifies as a force majeure. For an election that covers territory located wholly within one county, the county judge shall make the determination described by this subsection. SECTION 3.  Section 1.007, Election Code, is amended by adding Subsection (c-1) to read as follows: (c-1)  If a delivery, submission, or filing under this code requires submission in person by a specific time, the delivery, submission, or filing shall be accepted if the person or document entered the office before the prescribed deadline. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.